Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB58.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 3, 1933 (P.L.242, No.86), referred to as the Cosmetology Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.5. Change of Cosmetology Salon Location.--(a) The board shall immediately approve an application for a change of a salon location subm itted by a cosmetology salon that holds an existing salon license and has not been found by the board to have committed a violation of the provisions of this act if the salon owner provides the following information to the board:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (1) A sketch plan showing the layout of the new location of the salon, including the position of the doors, windows, partitions, shampoo basins, lavatories, adjustable chairs and other floor equipment.(2) The name and license number of the person who will be the designated person in charge of the salon in the owner's absence.(b) A bureau inspector shall perform an inspection of a new salon location for compliance with facility requirements within ten days of the board's approval of an application under subsection (a).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0058PN0048 - 2 - 123456789101112